Utah statutes.
31A-5-301.   Securities regulation.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (1)(b) and (c), no security issued
by a domestic or nondomestic insurance corporation may be sold in this state
by or for the corporation or any other person unless it is registered under
Section 31A-5-302 and otherwise complies with this chapter.  Securities that
comply with this chapter are not subject to Title 61, Chapter 1.
(b)  Securities and transactions exempt under Section 61-1-14 are also exempt
under this chapter.
(c)  Any exemption under Section 61-1-14 may be revoked by the commissioner
for a particular insurance corporation by an order after a hearing.  The order
shall explain the reasons for the revocation.
(2) (a)  No person which is organizing or is acquiring additional funds in
this state or elsewhere solely or partly for the purpose of organizing a
corporation under this chapter, may register or sell its securities in this
state, directly or indirectly, unless it obtains an organization permit under
Section 31A-5-204.
(b)  No security may be registered or sold in this state if the person
registering or selling the security, or any person affiliated with the person,
represents that an insurer will be organized or purchased in this state with
the proceeds of the sale, unless the issuer first obtains an organization
permit under Section 31A-5-204.
(3)  If a security is issued or sold in violation of this chapter, the
transaction is valid and enforceable by an outsider against the corporation or
against an insider, and is valid and enforceable by the corporation against an
insider.
(4)  This section does not apply to securities issued prior to July 1, 1986.
